Illinois, session 104th, HB4740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 12-2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/12-2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 148-2)7    Sec. 12-2. Travel Regulation Council; State travel 8reimbursement. 9    (a) The chairmen of the travel control boards established 10by Section 12-1, or their designees, shall together comprise 11the Travel Regulation Council. The Travel Regulation Council 12shall be chaired by the Director of Central Management 13Services, who shall be a nonvoting member of the Council, 14unless he is otherwise qualified to vote by virtue of being the 15designee of a voting member. No later than March 1, 1986, and 16at least biennially thereafter, the Council shall adopt State 17Travel Regulations and Reimbursement Rates which shall be 18applicable to all personnel subject to the jurisdiction of the 19travel control boards established by Section 12-1. An 20affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the Council 21shall be required to adopt regulations and reimbursement 22rates. If the Council fails to adopt regulations by March 1 of 23any odd-numbered year, the Director of Central Management   HB4740- 2 -LRB104 18669 SPS 32112 b1Services shall adopt emergency regulations and reimbursement 2rates pursuant to the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 3As soon as practicable after January 23, 2023 (the effective 4date of Public Act 102-1119), the Travel Regulation Council 5and the Higher Education Travel Control Board shall adopt 6amendments to their existing rules to ensure that 7reimbursement rates for public institutions of higher 8education, as defined in Section 1-13 of the Illinois 9Procurement Code, are set in accordance with the requirements 10of subsection (f) of this Section. 11    (b) (Blank).12    (c) (Blank).13    (d) Reimbursements to travelers shall be made pursuant to 14the rates and regulations applicable to the respective State 15agency as of January 1, 1986 (the effective date of Public Act 1684-345), until the State Travel Regulations and Reimbursement 17Rates established by this Section are adopted and effective.18    (e) (Blank).19    (f) Notwithstanding any rule or law to the contrary, State 20travel reimbursement rates for lodging and mileage for 21automobile travel, as well as allowances for meals, shall be 22set at the maximum rates established by the federal government 23for travel expenses, subsistence expenses, and mileage 24allowances under 5 U.S.C. 5701 through 5711 and any 25regulations promulgated thereunder. If the rates set under 26federal regulations increase or decrease during the course of   HB4740- 3 -LRB104 18669 SPS 32112 b1the State's fiscal year, the effective date of the new rate 2shall be the effective date of the change in the federal rate. 3    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 4the Council may provide, by rule, for alternative methods of 5determining the appropriate reimbursement rate for a 6traveler's subsistence expenses based upon the length of 7travel, as well as the embarkation point and destination. 8    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 9the Council may provide, by rule, procedures to allow for the 10up-front reimbursement of travelers for certain travel 11expenses covered under this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 102-1119, eff. 1-23-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 13103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)